Arkansas, session 2025, SB499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-42-111 is repealed.
23-42-111. Quarterly reports.
(a) The State Securities Department shall provide to the Legislative
Council, or to the Joint Budget Committee if the General Assembly is in
session, on a quarterly basis a report of all funds received or any external
fund transactions recognized or required through court orders or settlement
agreements.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) of this section shall
include:
(1) The case name of the court order or settlement agreement;
(2) The amount of funds received or transaction recognized or
*ANS387*
03/18/2025 11:39:54 AM ANS387

SB499
required by the department for each court order or settlement agreement;
(3)(A) A plan for disbursement of the received funds.
(B) If funds received from a court order or settlement
agreement are expended for any purpose, including investor education and
enforcement activities, the report shall itemize specific activities subject
to the exclusions provided in § 25-1-403(1)(B);
(4) An itemization of the specific investor education and
enforcement activities funded for the department;
(5) An explanation of whether the funds received or transactions
recognized or required from a court order or settlement agreement are
directed to a specific entity, and if so, the department shall provide a
summary of input regarding the drafting of the court order or settlement
agreement;
(6) A report of the rationale for disbursing funds to a specific
entity if the department receives funds from a court order or settlement
agreement that does not require disbursement of funds to a specific entity;
and
(7) A report of current balances of all unappropriated fund
holdings the department received from a court order or settlement agreement.
(c) The department shall provide the reports required under this
section no later than the fifteenth day of the month immediately following
the end of each quarter.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-61-112(a), concerning the information
required in the annual report of the State Insurance Department, is amended
to read as follows:
(a) As early in the calendar year as reasonably possible, the
Insurance Commissioner annually shall prepare and deliver a report to the
Secretary of the Department of Commerce showing, with respect to the
preceding calendar year:
(1) Names of the authorized insurers transacting insurance in
this state, with a summary of their financial statements that the
commissioner considers proper;
(2) Names of admitted insurers that closed during the year or
entered liquidation, a concise statement concerning the cause for each
proceeding, and the amount of assets and liabilities as ascertainable;
03/18/2025 11:39:54 AM ANS387

SB499
(3) The total receipts and expenses of the State Insurance
Department for the year; and
(4) A summary of the department's activities to investigate and
combat health insurance fraud, including without limitation information
regarding:
(A) Referrals received;
(B) Investigations initiated;
(C) Investigations completed; and
(D) Other material necessary or desirable to evaluate the
department's efforts to investigate and combat health insurance fraud; and
(5) Other pertinent information and matters the commissioner
considers proper.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-61-116 is repealed.
23-61-116. Annual report on health insurance fraud.
Annually on or before March 1, the Insurance Commissioner shall submit
to the Secretary of the Department of Commerce, the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Attorney
General a report summarizing the State Insurance Department's activities to
investigate and combat health insurance fraud, including without limitation
information regarding:
(1) Referrals received;
(2) Investigations initiated;
(3) Investigations completed; and
(4) Other material necessary or desirable to evaluate the
department's efforts under this section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-61-610 is repealed.
23-61-610. Annual report.
The Administrator of the Risk Management Division shall report annually
to the Governor and the Legislative Council on his or her findings and
recommendations.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-61-805(a), concerning reports of the
assessment and user fee under the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace, is
amended to read as follows:
03/18/2025 11:39:54 AM ANS387

SB499
(a)(1) The General Assembly shall establish a reasonable initial
assessment or user fee and reasonable increases or decreases in the amount of
future assessments or user fees and penalties and interest charges for
nonpayment of an assessment or user fee charged to participating health
insurers for the efficient operation of the Arkansas Health Insurance
Marketplace.
(2) Annually by October 1, the State Insurance Department shall
report to the Legislative Council in the manner and format that the
Legislative Council requires the recommendations of the department for the
initial assessment or user fee and increases or decreases in the amount of
future assessments or user fees and penalties and interest charges for
nonpayment of an assessment or user fee charged to participating health
insurers.
(3) Annually by December 1, the Legislative Council shall review
the recommendations of the department under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section and report to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives the recommendations of the Legislative
Council for the initial assessment or user fee and future increases or
decreases in the amount of assessments or user fees and penalties and
interest charges for nonpayment of an assessment or user fee charged to
participating health insurers.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-67-313(b) and (c), concerning the report
of the Arkansas Workers' Compensation Insurance Plan and servicing carriers,
are amended to read as follows:
(b) The commissioner shall review the plan operations to ensure
compliance with this act. The commissioner shall review and report to the
Legislative Council and the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce and
the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce by September 1 of each year,
with the first report to be submitted no later than September 1, 1997,
including, but not limited to, the following information:
(1) Competitive selection of the administrator and servicing
carriers;
(2) Plan operating performance and service in accordance with
the intent of this act, including performance reviews of the administrator,
servicing carriers, and plan rules;
03/18/2025 11:39:54 AM ANS387

SB499
(3) Proper authority and independence of the Arkansas office to
properly perform and secure prompt, fair, and reasonable service as required
by this act; and
(4) Coverage provided by the plan in other states, including
evidence providing that carriers promptly provide coverage for employees of
Arkansas employers working in other states as provided in this act.
(c) The commissioner is encouraged to hold public hearings as needed
to assist in achieving the objectives of this act and to assist with the
review and report provided to the Legislative Council and the Senate
Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the House Committee on Insurance and
Commerce.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-79-1503(c), concerning the rules and
reporting requirements under Wendelyn's Craniofacial Law — Craniofacial
Coverage, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The department shall submit biannual reports a report to the Chair
of the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce and the Chair of the Senate
Committee on Insurance and Commerce upon receipt of a request from:
(1) A cochair of the House Committee on Insurance and Commerce;
or
(2) A cochair of the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce.















03/18/2025 11:39:54 AM ANS387